Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.450

Injunction to prevent violations.

The director may bring an action to enjoin the violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter in the superior court in Thurston county or the county in which the violation occurs, notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law.

[ 2000 c 144 s 26; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 21.]